anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NI_POSS_LOC_COMBO_SUFFIXES
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2hk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2h  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2hk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Sg+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2h   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl+Loc:@U.person.NI@%>i2nâh  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâhk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px12Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2nâh NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâhk  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl+Loc:@U.person.KI@%>i2wâh  NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâhk   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px3Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@0%>i2wâh   NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thihk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.O@+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:@U.person.O@%>i2thih NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@U.person.MI@+PxX+Loc:@U.person.MI@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NI_NUMBER_LOC_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@ NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>a NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2hk NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.person.NULL@+Loc:@R.person.NULL@%>i2h NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.sg@+Sg:@D.sg@0 NOUN_ENDLEX ;
@R.sg.I@+Sg:@R.sg.I@%>i NOUN_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON NOUN_IRREGULARS
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg:nitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg:kitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg:otôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl:nitôtinân OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl:kitôtinaw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl:kitôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl:otôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl:otôtithiw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtih # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâh # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtithihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtithih # ;
LEXICON OSI_SUFFIXES
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:a # ;
LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX
@R.dim.DIM@:@R.dim.DIM@%^DIM NOUN_ENDLEX2 ;
@D.dim.DIM@ NOUN_ENDLEX2 ;
LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX2
@R.err.Thm@+Err/Thm:@R.err.Thm@0 NOUN_ENDLEX3 ;
@D.err.Thm@ NOUN_ENDLEX3 ;
LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX3
@R.err2.Dim@+Err/Dim:@R.err2.Dim@0 NOUN_ENDLEX4 ;
@D.err2.Dim@ NOUN_ENDLEX4 ;
LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX4
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@ # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@D.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@ # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@+Err/Orth:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@R.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@:@D.frag.FRAG@@R.cnj.CC@@D.joiner.NULL@%^IC # ;
